Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6112HV (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2755 Section 1. SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING PROGRAM. 1 1. The governor shall elect to participate in the federal 2 tax credit established by section 25F of the Internal Revenue 3 Code for individuals who make qualified contributions to 4 scholarship granting organizations. 5 2. The department of revenue and the department of education 6 shall follow all federal laws and regulations to administer the 7 federal tax credit established by section 25F of the Internal 8 Revenue Code to ensure the state is eligible to participate 9 in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and shall 10 annually submit all required information to the secretary of 11 the treasury of the United States for participation. 12